Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-569
Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Advisory Council Fund; created; use; investment.

The Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Advisory Council Fund is created. The fund shall consist of federal funds and grants or gifts for the purposes authorized by the Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Support Act. Expenditures from the fund shall be subject to any conditions agreed upon for receiving such funds, grants, or gifts. Such funds, grants, or gifts shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2026, LB867, § 19.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.